Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3605
Grower, defined.

Grower shall mean any landowner personally engaged in growing corn, a tenant of the landowner personally engaged in growing corn, and both the owner and tenant jointly and shall include a person, partnership, limited liability company, association, corporation, cooperative, trust, sharecropper, and other business unit, device, and arrangement.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 72.